District of Columbia statutes.
7-2905

Approval of recommendations.

(a)

The Mayor shall transmit the recommendations of the Commission to the Council for approval.

(b)

The recommendations shall be transmitted to the Council for a 45-day period, excluding days of Council recess. The Council shall take action to approve or disapprove the recommendations. If the Council does not take action within the 45-day period, the recommendations shall be deemed disapproved.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1306, 46 DCR 6373

Resolutions

Resolution 13-594, the “Health Care System Development Commission Recommendations Emergency Approval Resolution of 2000”, was approved effective June 26, 2000.